Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AMMONIA, HYDROGEN, AND RENEWABLE ENERGY CERTIFICATE TRACKING SYSTEM.new text end new text begin (a) $9,000,000 in fiscal year ..... is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to the Midwest Renewable Energy Tracking System for technology that enables tradable ammonia, hydrogen, and renewable energy certificates. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, and through January 1, 2030, an entity that receives a grant under this section must submit a report to the Legislative Auditor that details how the grant money received has been spent. new text end new text begin (c) Beginning January 1, 2030, and through January 1, 2035, an entity that receives a grant under this section must report to the commissioners of commerce and agriculture regarding the number of green ammonia certificates issued in Minnesota as a result of the grant money received. new text end